Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
In General

§§ 57-13-1 through 57-13-21.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 94, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§§57-13-1,57-13-3. [Codes, 1942, §§ 8946-21 and -22; Laws, 1964, ch. 216, §§ 1, 2]

§57-13-5. [Codes, 1942, § 8946-23; Laws, 1964, ch. 216, § 3; Laws, 1984, ch. 495, § 24; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 327; Laws, 1985, ch. 474, § 53; Laws, 1986, ch. 438, § 37; Laws, 1986, ch. 500 § 45; Laws, 1987, ch. 483, § 38; Laws, 1988, ch. 442, § 35]

§57-13-6. [Laws, 1987, ch. 304]

§57-13-7. [Codes, 1942, § 8946-24; Laws, 1964, ch. 216, § 4; Laws, 1974, ch. 563, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 239; Laws, 1986, ch. 336, § 1]

§§57-13-9 through57-13-11. [Codes, 1942, § 8946-25; Laws, 1964, ch. 216, § 5; Laws, 1966, ch. 233, § 3]

§57-13-13. [Codes, 1942, § 8946-26; Laws, 1964, ch. 216, § 6; Laws, 1984, ch. 313; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 328; Laws, 1985, ch. 438; Laws, 1987, ch. 395]

§57-13-15. [Codes, 1942, § 8946-27; Laws, 1964, ch. 216, § 7]

§57-13-17. [Codes, 1942, § 8946-28; Laws, 1964, ch. 216, § 8; Laws, 1981, ch. 320, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 432; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 329; Laws, 1988, ch. 324, § 5]

§57-13-19. [Codes, 1942, § 8946-29; Laws, 1964, ch. 216, § 9; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 330]

§57-13-21. [Codes, 1942, § 8946-30; Laws, 1964, ch. 216, § 10]

§ 57-13-22.
Abolition and transfer of functions, duties, personnel, records, etc., of Mississippi Research and Development Center.

The Mississippi Research and Development Center is hereby abolished from and after July 1, 1988. All of the functions of the center shall be transferred on that date to the Mississippi Department of Economic Development or to the University Research Center which is created in Section 37-141-3.

From and after July 1, 1988, the duties and responsibilities of the Research and Development Center which are depicted organizationally in the 1989 fiscal year budget request of the Research and Development Center and which are performed by the Forecast and Analysis Division, the Administration Division, the Government Services Division and the Data Services Division except as provided in subsection 3(b) shall be transferred to the University Research Center.

From and after July 1, 1988, the duties and responsibilities of the Research and Development Center not included in the transfer described in paragraph (a) except as provided in subsection (3)(c) of this section shall be transferred to the Mississippi Department of Economic Development.

All personnel of the Mississippi Research and Development Center shall be transferred to the Department of Economic Development or to the University Research Center according to the transfer of their duties pursuant to this section.

It is specifically provided that the positions identified in items (i), (ii) and (iii) below be transferred to the Department of Economic Development unless the Director of the Research and Development Center and the Executive Director of the Department of Economic Development make mutually agreeable substitutions:

Position identification numbers 60, 174, 244, 98 and 177 of the Administration Unit shall be transferred June 1, 1988.

Position identification numbers 156, 27, 194, 23, 307 and 308 of the Data Services Unit shall be transferred July 1, 1988.

Position identification numbers 71, 104 and 148 of the Government Services Division shall be transferred July 1, 1988.

It is specifically provided that position identification numbers 30 and 76 of the Office of the Director of the Research and Development Center be transferred to the University Research Center on July 1, 1988.

It is the intention of the Legislature that there be a reduction in personnel where there is a duplication of effort as a result of the transfers required by this subsection. The Department of Economic Development in its reorganization pursuant to Chapter 518, Laws of 1988 may utilize savings realized from personnel attrition and other economies to reallocate and reclassify positions within the department, subject to the approval of the State Personnel Board.

All personnel transferred to the University Research Center shall become subject to all personnel and compensation policies of the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning; however, anyone so transferred shall retain all of the protection and benefits to which they have been entitled under the state personnel system.

All records, property, unexpended balances of appropriations or other funds, and all other resources of the Mississippi Research and Development Center shall be transferred to the Department of Economic Development or to the University Research Center, as appropriate, pursuant to the transfer of duties and responsibilities in subsection (2) of this section.

Each officer or agency subject to the provisions of Chapter 518, Laws of 1988 shall assist with the fullest degree of reasonable cooperation any other officer or agency in carrying out the intent and purpose of Chapter 518, Laws of 1988.

Each officer or agency subject to the provisions of Chapter 518, Laws of 1988 is hereby authorized and empowered to promulgate all necessary rules and regulations not in conflict with Chapter 518, Laws of 1988 necessary to accomplish an orderly transition pursuant to Chapter 518, Laws of 1988.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 16, 1988).

§ 57-13-23.
Mississippi Automated Resource Information System (MARIS).

There is hereby created and established the Mississippi Automated Resource Information System (MARIS), (heretofore created by Executive Order No. 459, dated May 26, 1983, as amended by Executive Order No. 562, dated January 15, 1986), which shall be the mechanism within state government for the storing, processing, extracting and disseminating of useful data and information relating to the state’s resources.

The goal of MARIS shall be to facilitate the achievement of state agencies’ responsibilities as they relate to the development, management, conservation, protection and utilization of the resources of Mississippi by making usable resource data and information more readily available and in a format that is consistent throughout state departments, agencies and institutions, and, to the extent possible, with federal and privately generated resource data banks.

MARIS shall be under the supervision and general policy formulations of a policy committee as the cooperative effort of state departments, agencies and institutions for the sharing of useful data acquired and generated by state agencies in discharging their individual responsibilities.

There is hereby created and established the MARIS Policy Committee composed of the directors or their designees of the following departments, agencies and institutions:

Center for Population Studies, University of Mississippi

Central Data Processing Authority

Department of Agriculture and Commerce

Department of Archives and History

Department of Economic and Community Development

Department of Human Services

Department of Environmental Quality

Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks

Mississippi Department of Transportation

Mississippi Emergency Management Agency

Mississippi Mineral Resources Institute, University of Mississippi

Department of Finance and Administration

Office of the Secretary of State

Public Service Commission

Remote Sensing Center, Mississippi State University

State Forestry Commission

State Department of Health

State Oil and Gas Board

State Soil and Water Conservation Commission

State Tax Commission

University Research Center

Water Management Council.

The MARIS Policy Committee shall elect a chairman, vice-chairman and secretary, and it shall elect an executive committee from the membership of the policy committee to be composed of not less than five (5) nor more than nine (9) members, including the aforesaid officers. The policy committee may elect to the executive committee one (1) person other than from its membership. The policy committee shall determine the authority and responsibility to be exercised by the executive committee.

There is hereby created and established the MARIS Task Force which shall be composed of at least one (1) representative from each of the aforesaid agencies with knowledge in computer applications to natural, cultural, industrial or economic resources to be appointed by the respective directors thereof, and any other persons deemed advisable by the policy committee.

The University Research Center shall house the MARIS equipment and staff and shall provide administrative support for the policy committee and technical support to all member agencies.

It shall be the duty of every department, agency, office and institution of the State of Mississippi, and the officers thereof, to cooperate with and assist the MARIS Policy Committee in every reasonable way.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 336, § 2; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 54; Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 38, eff from and after July 1, 1992.